Wisconsin, session 2025, AB390.
do enact as follows:AB390,11Section 1. 48.433 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB390,3,4248.433 (2) Any birth parent whose rights have been terminated in this state 3at any time, or who has consented to the adoption of his or her child in this state 4before February 1, 1982, may file with the department, or agency contracted with 5under sub. (11), an affidavit authorizing the department or agency to provide the 1child with his or her original birth certificate and with any other available 2information about the birth parent’s identity and location. An affidavit filed under 3this subsection may be revoked at any time by notifying the department or agency 4in writing.AB390,25Section 2. 48.433 (3) (intro.) and (b) of the statutes are consolidated, 6renumbered 48.433 (3) and amended to read:AB390,3,12748.433 (3) Any person 18 years of age or over whose birth parent’s rights have 8been terminated in this state or who has been adopted in this state with the consent 9of his or her birth parent or parents before February 1, 1982, may request the 10department, or agency contracted with under sub. (11), to provide the person with 11the following: (b) Any any available information regarding the identity and location 12of his or her birth parents.AB390,313Section 3. 48.433 (3) (a) of the statutes is repealed.AB390,414Section 4. 48.433 (8) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB390,4,21548.433 (8) (a) If a birth parent of a requester under sub. (3) is known to be 16deceased, the department, or agency contracted with under sub. (11), shall so 17inform the requester. The department or agency shall provide the requester with 18the identity of the deceased parent. If both birth parents are known to be deceased, 19the department or agency shall provide the requester with his or her original birth 20certificate. If only one birth parent is known to be deceased, the department or 21agency shall provide the requester with his or her original birth certificate and any 22available information it has on file regarding the identity and location of the other 1birth parent if the other birth parent has filed an unrevoked affidavit under sub. 2(2).AB390,53Section 5. 69.14 (3) (c) of the statutes is renumbered 69.14 (3) (c) (intro.) and 4amended to read:AB390,4,10569.14 (3) (c) (intro.) If at any time after a birth record is filed for a registrant 6under this subsection a birth record filed for the registrant at the time of birth of 7the registrant is found or the registrant is adopted and the adoptive parents sign a 8birth record giving their names as the adoptive parents, the state registrar shall 9impound the birth record filed under this subsection and prohibit access thereto, 10except by under any of the following circumstances:AB390,4,11111. In response to a court order or except by.AB390,4,12122. To the state registrar for processing purposes.AB390,613Section 6. 69.14 (3) (c) 3. of the statutes is created to read:AB390,4,151469.14 (3) (c) 3. When providing an uncertified copy of the impounded birth 15record to the registrant in accordance with s. 69.21 (2) (bm).AB390,716Section 7. 69.15 (6) (b) of the statutes is renumbered 69.15 (6) (b) (intro.) and 17amended to read:AB390,4,221869.15 (6) (b) (intro.) The state registrar shall register a new record created 19under this section and shall impound the original record or the record registered 20under sub. (5) and all correspondence, affidavits, court orders and other related 21materials and prohibit access thereto, except by under any of the following 22circumstances:AB390,4,23231. In response to a court order or except by.AB390,5,112. To the state registrar for processing purposes or except when.AB390,5,223. When a disclosure is authorized under ss. s. 48.432 and 48.433.AB390,5,53(bm) The state registrar shall send notice of any new record registered under 4this section to the local registrar who filed the original record. Upon notification, 5the local registrar shall destroy his or her copy of the original record.AB390,86Section 8. 69.15 (6) (b) 4. of the statutes is created to read:AB390,5,8769.15 (6) (b) 4. When providing an uncertified copy of the impounded birth 8record to the registrant in accordance with s. 69.21 (2) (bm).AB390,99Section 9. 69.21 (2) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:AB390,5,151069.21 (2) (bm) 1. If a registrant is 18 years of age or older and is the subject of 11a birth record that was impounded under s. 69.14 (3) (c) or 69.15 (6) (b), the state 12registrar shall, upon request by the registrant, provide the registrant with 13unrestricted access to the registrant’s unaltered birth record impounded under s. 1469.14 (3) (c) or 69.15 (6) (b) and issue to the registrant an uncertified copy of the 15registrant’s unaltered birth record impounded under s. 69.14 (3) (c) or 69.15 (6) (b).AB390,5,18162. When issuing an uncertified copy of a birth record to a registrant under 17subd. 1., the state registrar shall inform the registrant of the provisions of ss. 1848.432 and 48.433.AB390,1019Section 10. 69.22 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB390,5,232069.22 (1) (b) Except as provided under par. (c), $20 for issuing an uncertified 21copy of a vital record issued under s. 69.21 (2) (a) or, (b), or (bm), $7 for verifying 22information about the event submitted by a requester without issuance of a copy, 23and $3 for any additional copy of the same vital record issued at the same time.AB390,111Section 11. Initial applicability.AB390,6,52(1) The treatment of ss. 69.21 (2) (bm) and 69.22 (1) (b), the renumbering and 3amendment of ss. 69.14 (3) (c) and 69.15 (6) (b), and the creation of ss. 69.14 (3) (c) 43. and 69.15 (6) (b) 4. first apply to a request made for an uncertified copy of an 5impounded birth record on the effective date of this subsection.AB390,6,66